Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-7,101
Livestock certification program; department; immunity.

The department and its representatives shall not be held liable for unintentional loss or damage which occurs during certification testing, surveillance and monitoring, disease reporting, or disease research and laboratory testing, or because of certification or lack thereof in a voluntary livestock certification program.

Laws 2001, LB 438, § 14.

Definitions, see section 54-701.03.